Hawaii, session 2026, HB2151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii is experiencing an ongoing housing crisis marked by a severe shortage of affordable housing, escalating construction costs, and heavy reliance on imported building materials.  These challenges are compounded by the State's geographic isolation, vulnerability to supply chain disruptions, and the urgent need to reduce greenhouse gas emissions and improve climate resilience in the built environment. The legislature further finds that hempcrete, also known as hemp-lime, is a bio-composite building material made from the woody core of the industrial hemp plant, combined with a lime-based binder and water.  Hempcrete is widely used internationally as a non-structural building material for wall infill, insulation, and plaster.  Hempcrete is fire-resistant, mold-resistant, pest-resistant, breathable, and capable of sequestering carbon over its lifecycle. The legislature recognizes that indigenous nations and tribal communities in the continental United States, including tribes in Minnesota, have been leaders in advancing hempcrete construction as a means of promoting sustainable housing, cultural self-determination, workforce development, and community resilience.  These efforts demonstrate how natural building materials can support housing needs while aligning with values of stewardship, self-sufficiency, and long-term environmental responsibility. The legislature additionally finds that clarifying hempcrete as an approved non-structural building material in state law will reduce regulatory uncertainty, lower barriers to innovation in construction, and allow builders, architects, and homeowners to utilize this material without requiring repeated variances or discretionary approvals.  By enabling broader use of hempcrete, Hawaii can support the development of more climate-appropriate housing, diversify construction methods, reduce material costs over time, and help expand the supply of housing necessary to address the State's housing crisis. The purpose of this Act is to support the development of sustainable, affordable, and resilient housing in the State by: (1)  Recognizing hempcrete, also known as hemp-lime, as an allowable non-structural building material under state law; (2)  Clarifying that no state or county building code shall prohibit the use of a hempcrete; and (3)  Providing clear authority for building officials to approve hempcrete construction that meets applicable safety and performance standards. SECTION 2.  Chapter 107, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§107-     Hempcrete use; building material.  (a) Hempcrete, also known as hemp-lime, shall be recognized as an allowable non-structural building material in the State. (b)  No provision of the Hawaii state building codes or any county building code shall prohibit or otherwise limit the use of hempcrete as a non-structural building material. (c)  Hempcrete shall be permitted for use in non-load-bearing construction; provided that the material and the material's application shall comply with all applicable requirements relating to: (1)  Fire safety; (2)  Structural integrity of the overall building system; (3)  Moisture management and durability; (4)  Energy efficiency; and (5)  Health and safety standards. (d)  Hempcrete shall not be used as a load-bearing structural element unless otherwise approved pursuant to applicable state building codes and standards as recognized in section 107-25. (e)  State and county building officials may approve the use of hempcrete as a non-structural building material without requiring a variance; provided that the proposed use of hempcrete shall comply with applicable state building codes, rules, and standards. (f) The department, in consultation with the counties, may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to implement this section.  Rules adopted pursuant to this section may include providing guidance regarding approval of hempcrete construction consistent with applicable state building codes and nationally recognized standards. (g)  As used in this section: "Hemp" means Cannabis sativa L. and any part of that plant, including the seeds thereof and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers, whether growing or not, with a total tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of no more than 0.3 per cent on a dry weight basis. "Hempcrete" or "hemp-lime" means a bio-composite material consisting of the woody core of industrial hemp, a lime-based binder, and water. "Industrial hemp" means hemp: (1)  Grown for the use of the stalk of the plant, fiber produced from such a stalk, or any other non-cannabinoid derivative, mixture, preparation, or manufacture of such a stalk; (2)  Grown for the use of the whole grain, oil, cake, nut, hull, or any other non-cannabinoid compound, derivative, mixture, preparation, or manufacture of the seeds of such plant; (3)  Grown for purposes of producing microgreens or other edible hemp leaf products intended for human consumption that are derived from an immature hemp plant that is grown from seeds with a total tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of no more than 0.3 per cent on a dry weight basis; (4)  That is a plant that does not enter the stream of commerce and is intended to support hemp research at an institution of higher education or an independent research institute; or (5)  Grown for the use of a viable seed of the plant produced solely for the production or manufacture of any material described in paragraphs (1) through (4)." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________